Utah statutes.
64-13-32.   Discipline of offenders -- Use of force.

(1)  If an offender offers violence to an officer or other employee of the Department of Corrections, or to another offender, or to any other person; attempts to damage or damages any corrections property; attempts to escape; or resists or refuses to obey any lawful and reasonable command; the officers and other employees of the department may use all reasonable means, including the use of weapons, to defend themselves and department property and to enforce the observance of discipline and prevent escapes.

(2)  An inmate who is housed in  a secure correctional facility and is in the act of escaping from that secure correctional facility or from the custody of a peace or correctional officer is presumed to pose a threat of death or serious bodily injury to an officer or others if apprehension is delayed. Notwithstanding Section 76-2-404, a peace or correctional officer is justified in using deadly force if he reasonably believes deadly force is necessary to apprehend the inmate.



Amended by Chapter 49, 1993 General Session

